Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-7,108
Prohibited transfers; certificate of veterinary inspection; duties of exotic animal auction or exchange venue organizer; requirements for certain animals.

(1) No beef or dairy cattle, calves, swine, bison, or domesticated cervine animals shall be, or offered to be, consigned, purchased, sold, bartered, traded, given away, or otherwise transferred at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue.

(2) An exotic animal auction or exchange venue organizer shall contact the department if a particular animal cannot be readily identified as an animal that is prohibited from being consigned, purchased, sold, bartered, traded, given away, or otherwise transferred at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue under this section.

(3) No bovine, camelid, caprine, ovine, or porcine animal shall be, or be offered to be, consigned, purchased, sold, bartered, traded, given away, or otherwise transferred at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue unless, prior to a change of ownership or other transfer of the animal, a completed certificate of veterinary inspection for such animal is presented to the exotic animal auction or exchange venue organizer. Such certificate of veterinary inspection shall be signed by an accredited veterinarian on the date of or no more than thirty days prior to the date the exotic animal auction or exchange venue is held.

(4) An exotic animal auction or exchange venue organizer shall contract with an accredited veterinarian to be present during the exotic animal auction or exchange venue for visually inspecting such exotic animals and to issue necessary certificates of veterinary inspection for change of ownership when required by the Animal Health and Disease Control Act or the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act.

(5) All dairy goats imported into Nebraska shall have an official tuberculin test prior to import into Nebraska. All sheep and goats shall have official identification as required under the Animal Health and Disease Control Act.

(6) A copy of the certificate of veterinary inspection shall be submitted to the department by the exotic animal auction or exchange venue organizer within seven days from the date the exotic animal auction or exchange venue was held.

(7) Any bovine, camelid, caprine, ovine, or porcine animal which is not prohibited from transfer at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue shall be officially identified prior to change of ownership.

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 72.

Animal Health and Disease Control Act, see section 54-2901.

Definitions, see section 54-701.03.

Department of Agriculture, State Veterinarian, powers, see sections 54-703 to 54-705.

Violations, penalties, see section 54-752.